Hawaii statutes.
§454F-2.5 Exempt sponsoring mortgage loan
originator company; registration. Any person exempt from the
licensing provisions of this chapter may register with NMLS for the purpose of
sponsoring a mortgage loan originator required to be licensed by this chapter.
[L 2011, c 194, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 168, §20]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next